en: Fresh sweet peppers
bg: Пресни чушки
da: Friske peberfrugter
fr: Poivrons frais
hr: Svježe slatke paprike
nl: Verse paprikas

en: Cooked sweet peppers
da: Kokte peberfrugter

en: Green sweet peppers, Green bell peppers
bg: Зелени чушки
da: Grønne peberfrugter
de: Grüne Paprika
es: Pimientos verdes
fr: Poivrons verts
hr: Zelene slatke paprike
ja: 緑ピーマン
nl: Groene paprikas

en: Cooked sweet green peppers
da: Kokte grønne peberfrugter
fr: Poivrons verts cuits

en: Yellow sweet peppers, Sweet peppers (yellow)
bg: Жълти чушки
da: Gule peberfrugter
es: Pimientos amarillos
fr: Poivrons jaunes
he: גמבות צהובות, פלפלים צהובים
hr: Žute slatke paprike
ja: 黄ピーマン
nl: Paprikas (geel), Gele paprikas, Paprikas(geel)

en: Fresh yellow sweet peppers
da: Friske gule peberfrugter
nl: Verse gele paprikas

en: Cooked sweet red peppers
da: Kokte røde peberfrugter
fr: Poivrons rouges cuits
hr: Kuhana slatka crvena paprika
nl: Gekookte rode paprikas

en: Cooked sweet yellow peppers
da: Kokte gule peberfrugter
fr: Poivrons jaunes cuits
hr: Kuhana slatka žuta paprika
nl: Gekookte gele paprikas

en: Mixed bell peppers, Mixed sweet peppers
da: Blandede peberfrugter
de: Paprika Mix, gemischte Paprika
es: Mezclas de pimientos multicolores
fr: Mélanges de poivrons multicolores
hr: Miješane paprike babure
nl: Gemengde paprikas

en: Red bell peppers, Red sweet peppers
bg: Червени чушки
da: Røde peberfrugter
de: Rote Paprika
es: Pimientos rojos
fr: Poivrons rouges
hr: Crvene paprike babure
ja: 赤ピーマン
nl: Rode paprikas

en: Canned sweet red peppers
bg: Червени чушки от консерва
es: Pimientos rojos en conserva
fr: Poivrons rouges en conserve, Poivrons rouges appertisés
hr: Konzervirana slatka crvena paprika
nl: Rode paprikas in blik/pot

en: Jalapeños
xx: Jalapeño
bg: Халапеньо
fr: Jalapeño, chipotle, morita
ja: ハラペーニョ
nl: Jalapenopepers

en: Sliced jalapeños
da: Jalapeño i skiver
fi: Viipaloitu jalapeño
sv: Skivad jalapeño

en: Friggitelli
sv: Feferoni, Peperoni

en: Piquillo pepper
ca: Pebrot del piquillo
es: Pimientos del piquillo
eu: Pikillo piper
fr: Poivrons de piquillo, pimiento del piquillo, pimiento de piquillo, Piquillo de Lodosa
hr: Piquillo papar

en: Stuffed peppers
da: Fyldte peberfrugter
es: Pimientos rellenos
fr: Poivrons farcis, Poivron farci
hr: Punjene paprike
it: Peperoni ripieni
nl: Gevulde paprikas

en: Grilled peppers
da: Grillede peberfrugter
de: Gegrillte Paprikas
fr: Poivrons grillés
hr: Pečene paprike
nl: Geroosterde paprikas

en: Potatoes and their products
da: Kartofler og kartoffelprodukter
sv: Potatis och potatisprodukter

en: Potatoes
bg: Картофи
da: Kartofler
de: Kartoffeln
es: Patatas, Papas
fi: perunat
fr: Pommes de terre, patates, Solanum tuberosum
hr: krumpir
it: Patate
ja: ジャガイモ, じゃがいも, 馬鈴薯
la: Solanum tuberosum
nl: Aardappelen
pt: Batatas
ru: Картофель
sv: Potatisar, potatis, kartoffel
tr: Patates

en: Floury potatoes, Mealy potatoes, Starchy potatoes
da: Melede kartofler
de: Mehligkochende Kartoffeln
sv: Mjöliga potatisar